Oklahoma, session 2026, SB231.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 1357.10, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1357.10. A. The sale of an article of clothing or


footwear designed to be worn on or about the human body items listed


in subsection B of this section shall be exempt from the tax imposed


by Section 1354 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title if:


1. The sales price of the article is less than One Hundred


Dollars ($100.00); and


2. The sale takes place during a period beginning at 12:01 a.m.


on the first Friday in August and ending at 12 midnight on the


following Sunday, covering a period of three (3) days.


B. Items exempt pursuant to the provisions of subsection A are:



Req. No. 386 Page 1


1. An article of clothing or footwear designed to be worn on or


about the human body;


2. Sport or recreational equipment designed for human use and


worn in conjunction with an athletic or recreational activity that


are not suitable for general use;


3. A school supply commonly used by a student in a course of


study;


4. A school art supply commonly used by a student in a course


of study for artwork;


5. A school instructional material which is a written material


commonly used by a student in a course of study as a reference and


to learn the subject being taught; and


6. A school computer supply commonly used by a student in a


course of study in which a computer is used.


C. Subsection A of this section shall not apply to:


1. Any special clothing or footwear that is primarily designed


for athletic activity or protective use and that is not normally


worn except when used for athletic activity or protective use for


which it is designed;


2. Accessories, including jewelry, handbags, luggage,


umbrellas, wallets, watches, and similar items carried on or about


the human body, without regard to whether worn on the body in a


manner characteristic of clothing; and


3. The rental of clothing or footwear.

Req. No. 386 Page 2


C. D. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall promulgate any


necessary rules to implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-386 QD 12/30/2024 5:08:25 PM































Req. No. 386 Page 3